Hawaii statutes.
§523A-19 Periods of limitation. (a)
The expiration, before or after July 1, 2009, of a period of limitation on the
owner's right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract,
statute, or court order, shall not preclude the property from being presumed
abandoned or affect a duty to file a report or to pay or deliver or transfer
property to the administrator as required by this part.

(b) An action or proceeding may not be
maintained by the administrator to enforce this part in regard to the
reporting, delivery, or payment of property more than ten years after the
holder specifically identified the property in a report filed with the
administrator or gave express notice to the administrator of a dispute
regarding the property. In the absence of such a report or other express
notice, the period of limitation shall be tolled. The period of limitation
shall also be tolled by the filing of a report that is fraudulent.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2014, any claim made
under this part for funds in the unclaimed property trust fund shall be void if
the claim is:

(1) For funds totaling less than $100; and

(2) Filed more than ten years after the date that the
full amount of the claim was deposited into the unclaimed property trust fund;

provided that for funds totaling less than $100 that
were deposited into the unclaimed property trust fund on or prior to June 30,
2014, the ten-year time limitation on claiming the funds shall commence on July
1, 2014. Unclaimed funds subject to this subsection, upon the expiration of
the ten-year time limitation, shall escheat to the State and be transferred to
the general fund. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 184, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next